New York, session 2025-2026, S10081.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 3 of subsection (b) of section 3449 of the insur- 2 ance law, as added by chapter 386 of the laws of 2024, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (3) A group policy of wireless communications equipment insurance may 5 be offered as part of a wireless communications equipment protection 6 plan, provided that the wireless communications equipment vendor at the 7 same time also offers the wireless communication equipment insurance 8 [from the same insurer], any service contract, and any other contract 9 for goods or services included as part of any such wireless communi- 10 cations equipment protection plan and discloses the premium or fee for 11 each on a stand-alone basis. The stand-alone wireless communication 12 equipment insurance coverage may be issued either on a group or individ- 13 ual basis. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 15 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 16 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 17 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 18 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15573-01-6